Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1355.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 17 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER EVETERANS TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY ANDPOST-TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER TREATMENTSec.1741. Definitions.1742. Pilot program.1743. Annual report.§ 1741. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Eligible entity." Any of the following:(1) A nonprofit organization.(2) An academic institution engaged in research with respect to traumatic brain injuries and post-traumatic stress disorders.(3) A health care provider with expertise in neurorehabilitative therapies.(4) An entity the department or the Department of Health DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH OR THE DEPARTMENT determines appropriate for an award of a grant under this section 1742 (RELATING TO PILOT PROGRAM) . "Treatment." With respect to a traumatic brain injury or post-traumatic stress disorder, clinical interventions, the use of therapeutic devices or rehabilitation care provided directly to a veteran with a traumatic brain injury or post-traumatic stress disorder.§ 1742. Pilot program. (a) Establishment.--The department DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH , in consultation with the Department of Health DEPARTMENT , shall establish a pilot program to award grants to eligible entities for the development, implementation and evaluation of treatment.(b) Posting.--The department DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH shall post information announcing the pilot program and guidelines on the department's DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH'S publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Application.--(1) Each eligible entity shall apply in the manner determined by the department DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . (2) Each eligible entity shall provide, in the 20260SB1355PN1835 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application, the eligible entity's qualifications, proposed activities, expected outcomes and plans:(i) For evaluating effectiveness to improve mental health outcomes among veterans.(ii) To reduce suicidality and common risk factors for completing suicide, including depression and substance use disorders among veterans.(iii) To mitigate long-term effects of traumatic brain injuries and post-traumatic stress disorders.(d) Regions.--The department DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH , in consultation with the Department of Health DEPARTMENT , to the greatest extent practicable, shall select one entity each from the eastern, central and western regions of this Commonwealth.(e) Award.--The department DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH shall annually award a grant of $150,000 to each of the selected entities for the duration of the pilot program.(f) Use.--Each eligible entity awarded a grant under this section shall use the grant as provided under subsection (a).(g) Expiration.--The authority to award grants under this section shall expire three years from the effective date of this subsection.§ 1743. Annual report.By March 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, the department DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives a report detailing the awarding of grants in the prior fiscal year, describing the programs and projects that received grants and an 20260SB1355PN1835 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evaluation of the projects.Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20260SB1355PN1835 - 4 - 12